Utah statutes.
48-3a-1102.   Application of this part.

(1)  If a conflict arises between this part and another provision of this chapter, this part controls.

(2)  Notwithstanding the other provisions of this part, on and after January 1, 2016:

(a)  a professional services company may not designate series of transferable interests; and

(b)  a limited liability company may not form a professional services company as a series of the limited liability company.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

